sv: Baby och småbarn > Amning och matning > Nutrition > Nappflaskor: Flaskor mot kolik; Standardflaskor; Flaskor med bred hals
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Emzirme ve Beslenme > Beslenme Gereçleri > Biberonlar: Antikolik Biberonlar; Standart Biberonlar; Geniş Ağız Biberonlar
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การให้นม > อุปกรณ์สำคัญในการป้อนอาหารเด็ก > ขวดนมสำหรับทารก: ขวดป้องกันอาการโคลิก; ขวดมาตรฐาน; ขวดคอกว้าง
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Stillen & Füttern > Zubehör für Babynahrung > Babyflaschen: Anti-Kolik-Flaschen; Standardflaschen; Weithalsflaschen
nl: Baby en peuter > Borstvoeding en voeding > Voedingsbenodigdheden > Zuigflessen: Antikoliekflessen; Standaard flessen; Flessen met brede hals
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Allaitement et alimentation > Essentiels pour l’alimentation > Biberons: Biberons anti coliques; Biberons standards; Biberons à col large
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Imetys ja syöttäminen > Syöttämisen perustarvikkeet > Tuttipullot: Koliikinestopullot; Tavalliset pullot; Leveäkaulaiset pullot
pt-BR: Infantil > Amamentação e alimentação > Itens essenciais para alimentação > Mamadeiras: Mamadeiras anti-cólicas; Mamadeiras padrão; Mamadeiras largas
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dojenje i hranjenje > Pribor za hranjenje > Dječje bočice: Bočice protiv kolika; Standardne bočice; Bočice sa širokim grlom
da: Baby og småbørn > Amning og madning > Nødvendigheder til bespisning > Sutteflasker: Antikolikflasker; Standardflasker; Flasker med bred hals
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dojenje in hranjenje > Osnovni pripomočki za hranjenje > Otroške stekleničke: Stekleničke proti kolikam; Standardne stekleničke; Stekleničke s širokim vratom
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 哺乳与喂养 > 喂养必需品 > 婴儿奶瓶: 防胀气奶瓶; 标准奶瓶; 宽口径奶瓶
nb: Baby og barn > Amming og mating > Nødvendigheter for fôring > Babyflasker: Flasker mot kolikk; Standardflasker; Flasker med bred åpning
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Cho con bú và cho ăn > Dụng cụ ăn dặm > Bình sữa em bé: Bình sữa chống đầy hơi; Bình sữa chuẩn; Bình sữa cổ rộng
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Amamentação e alimentação > Essencial para alimentação > Biberões de bebé: Biberões anticólicas; Biberões padrão; Biberões de pescoço largo
ru: Товары для детей > Питание и кормление > Посуда для кормления > Детские бутылочки: Антиколиковые бутылочки; Стандартные бутылочки; Бутылочки с широким горлышком
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Karmienie > Podstawowe artykuły do karmienia niemowląt > Butelki dla niemowląt: Butelki antykolkowe; Standardowe butelki; Butelki z szeroką szyjką
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Кърмене и хранене > Прибори за хранене на бебета > Бебешки шишета: Шишета против колики; Стандартни шишета; Шишета с широко гърло
it: Bebè e bimbi > Allattamento e alimentazione > Alimenti essenziali > Biberon: Biberon anti-coliche; Biberon standard; Biberon a collo largo
en: Baby & Toddler > Nursing & Feeding > Feeding Essentials > Baby Bottles: Anti Colic Bottles; Standard Bottles; Wide Neck Bottles
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 哺育和餵食 > 餵食必需品 > 奶瓶: 防脹氣奶瓶; 標準奶瓶; 寬口奶瓶
ja: ベビー用品 > 授乳・離乳食 > 離乳食用品 > 哺乳瓶: コリック防止哺乳瓶; 標準哺乳瓶; ワイドネック哺乳瓶
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Θηλασμός & σίτιση > Απαραίτητα σκεύη σίτισης > Μπιμπερό: Μπουκάλια κατά των κολικών; Κανονικά μπιμπερό; Μπιμπερό με φαρδύ λαιμό
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Szoptatás és etetés > Etetőkellékek > Cumisüvegek: Kólika elleni üvegek; Szabványos üvegek; Széles nyakú üvegek
ko: 영유아 > 수유/이유식 용품 > 유아식 필수품 > 젖병: 배앓이 방지 젖병; 표준형 젖병; 와이드넥 젖병
cs: Děti a kojenci > Kojení a krmení > Základní potřeby ke krmení > Kojenecké lahve: Lahve proti kolice; Standardní lahve; Láhve se širokým hrdlem
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Žindymas ir maitinimas > Būtiniausi maitinimo reikmenys > Kūdikių buteliukai: Buteliukai nuo dieglių; Standartiniai buteliukai; Buteliukai plačiu kakleliu
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Alăptare și hrănire > Articole esențiale pentru hrănire > Biberoane: Biberoane anti-colici; Biberoane standard; Biberoane cu circumferință mare
sk-SK: Bábätká > Dojčenie a kŕmenie > Základné potreby na kŕmenie > Dojčenské fľaše: Antikolikové fľaše; Štandardné fľaše; Fľaše so širokým hrdlom
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Lactancia y alimentación > Artículos esenciales de alimentación > Biberones: Biberones anticólicos; Biberones estándar; Biberones de cuello ancho